udm.dic
автономио/A1A2
агрессивной/A1A2
адямилыко/A1A2
азьлось/A1A2D1
активной/A1A2
алой/A1A2
анайлыко/A1A2
античной/A1A2
армейской/A1A2
арымо/A1A2
атай-анайтэм/A1A2
бабыли/A1A2
бакельлыко/A1A2
батарейной/A1A2
безэг/A1A2N2
беризё/A1A2
библейской/A1A2
блама/A1A2N2D1
бороздаё/A1A2
бугыро/A1A2
бур/A1A2D1N2
бухгалтерской/A1A2
былама/A1A2N2D1
вайыжъем/A1A2
валлянаос/A1A2
ваньбуро/A1A2
векышъям/A1A2
веськырес/A1A2D1
виль/A1A2N2
висо-вожо/A1A2
внештатной/A1A2
военно-политической/A1A2
возо/A1A2
вӧлмыт/A1A2D1
ворпоё/A1A2
всесоюзной/A1A2
вурысо/A1A2
выль/A1A2N2
гара/A1A2
геохимической/A1A2
гижлоё/A1A2
голькак/A1A2
гордань/A1A2N2
грамматической/A1A2
гуманной/A1A2
гызы/A1A2N2
дано/A1A2
декоративной/A1A2
дивизионной/A1A2
диссертационной/A1A2
дӧлеттэм/A1A2
дуанӥ/A1A2
дурыс/A1A2D1
дэесь/A1A2
ежо/A1A2
ёртэто/A1A2
жаркой/A1A2
жингырес/A1A2D1
ӝомыт/A1A2D1N2
жум/A1A2
ӝыныё-урдсо/A1A2
закадровой/A1A2
западной/A1A2
ӟарыт-ӵуж/A1A2
ӟечлыктэм/A1A2
ӟирыё/A1A2
зоро/A1A2
ӟугырес/A1A2
ӟызы/A1A2
иезуитской/A1A2
икты-кокты/A1A2
иностранной/A1A2
иранской/A1A2
итальян/A1A2
йӧлэсь/A1A2
йыло-пумо/A1A2
йырсазьтэм/A1A2
каз/A1A2
калер/A1A2
кандыко/A1A2
картинной/A1A2
катлыко/A1A2
кежег/A1A2D1N2
кеньыриё/A1A2
кечато/A1A2
кизерлыко/A1A2
кир-кур/A1A2
классной/A1A2N2
кожель/A1A2
колтрок/A1A2
коммунистической/A1A2
кондитерской/A1A2
конфликто/A1A2
коренной/A1A2
кото-кото/A1A2
кредитной/A1A2
куальтрес/A1A2D1
кубической/A1A2
кузтэм-палтэм/A1A2
куйтэм/A1A2
кунмуртлыко/A1A2
куроем/A1A2
кушето/A1A2
кылыко/A1A2
кыэсь/A1A2
лафетной/A1A2
лесопильной/A1A2
литовской/A1A2
луоесь/A1A2
лымыё/A1A2
люкрес/A1A2
манитэм/A1A2
междометной/A1A2
меховой/A1A2
могдос/A1A2
мосо/A1A2
мултэс/A1A2D1L2
мурттэм/A1A2
мыт-горд/A1A2
народно-хозяйственной/A1A2
нейтральной/A1A2
нимъем/A1A2
нугылес/A1A2N2
нычкыт/A1A2D1
нянё/A1A2
общенациональной/A1A2
огӝужда/A1A2D1
огъяполитической/A1A2
определённой/A1A2
осколочной/A1A2
ӧчкес/A1A2
пальтырес/A1A2
патриархальной/A1A2
переговорной/A1A2
пилеш/A1A2D1
пластмассовой/A1A2
пож/A1A2N2
полысо/A1A2
похвальной/A1A2
пригородной/A1A2
производительной/A1A2
публицистической/A1A2
пушкерес/A1A2
пырыӟ/A1A2
раттэм/A1A2
рецептурной/A1A2
сабырсыз/A1A2
санлыко/A1A2
сельской/A1A2
сизьымо/A1A2L2
символической/A1A2
скульптурной/A1A2
сӧзыо/A1A2
становой/A1A2
сумедо/A1A2
сьӧдэн-куренен/A1A2
сюръем/A1A2
ташкес/A1A2
типовой/A1A2
токарно-револьверной/A1A2
трагической/A1A2
тумошо/A1A2D1N2
тыка/A1A2
тэесь/A1A2
ужо/A1A2
уло/A1A2
уродгем/A1A2D1
федеративной/A1A2
форменной/A1A2
ходовой/A1A2
чагырес/A1A2
чеберлыко/A1A2
чиль-сьӧд/A1A2
ӵуж/A1A2
ӵуштырес/A1A2
шальтыр/A1A2
шиляё/A1A2
шоръёзо/A1A2
шуни/A1A2N2
ымтэм/A1A2
электрической/A1A2
эро/A1A2
юмало-коняло/A1A2
яло/A1A2
акамат/D1A1A2
ӝыны/D1N2L2
ӝытазе/D1A1A2
ичи/D1L2
нялтас/D1A1A2
ого-кыкто/D1L2
ӧжыт/D1L2
трос/D1M1L2N2
уно/D1M1L2
шундан-мендан/D1A1A2
биллион/L1L2
витен-витен/L1L2D1
витетӥез/L1L2
витьдас/L1L2
витьмос/L1L2
витьтонэтӥ/L1L2
дас/L1L2N2
дасмос/L1L2
дасо-кызё/L1L2
дасэн/L1L2D1
дасэтӥ/L1L2
киямыс/L1L2
куамын/L1L2
куамынэтӥез/L1L2
куатетӥ/L1L2
куать/L1L2
куатьмос/L1L2
куатьтонэтӥ/L1L2
куинен-куинен/L1L2D1
куинетӥез/L1L2
куиньметӥ/L1L2
куиньмос/L1L2
кызетӥ/L1L2
кызё/L1L2
кызь/L1L2N2A1A2D1
кык/L1L2
кыкен-кыкен/L1L2D1
кыкетӥ/L1L2
кыкетӥез/L1L2
кыкмос/L1L2
кыксю/L1L2
кыктэн/L1L2D1
кыктэтӥез/L1L2
кыкъямыс/L1L2
кыкъямыстон/L1L2
ноль/L1L2
нырысетӥ/L1L2
нырысетӥез/L1L2
ньылетӥез/L1L2
ньылё/L1L2
ньыль/L1L2
ньыльвыртно/L1L2A1A2
ньыльдас/L1L2
ньыльдон/L1L2
ньыльмос/L1L2
ньыльсю/L1L2
ог/L1L2
оген-кыкен/L1L2D1
оген-оген/L1L2D1
ог-кык/L1L2
одӥг/L1L2A1A2D1
одӥген/L1L2D1
одӥген-кыкен/L1L2D1
одӥгетӥ/L1L2
одӥгетӥез/L1L2
одӥг-кык/L1L2
одӥг-одӥг/L1L2
одӥгысь-одӥг/L1L2
первоез/L1L2
сизьымдас/L1L2
сизьымдон/L1L2
сизьымдонэтӥ/L1L2
сизьыметӥ/L1L2
сизьыметӥез/L1L2
сизьыммос/L1L2
сюмос/L1L2
сюрс/L1L2N2
сюрсмос/L1L2
сюрсэн-сюрсэн/L1L2D1
сюрсэтӥ/L1L2
сюрсэтӥез/L1L2
сюэн-сюрсэн/L1L2D1
сюэтӥ/L1L2
сюэтӥез/L1L2
тямыс/L1L2
тямысо/L1L2
тямыстон/L1L2
тямыстонэтӥез/L1L2
тямысэтӥ/L1L2
тямысэтӥез/L1L2
укмыс/L1L2
укмысдас/L1L2
укмысо/L1L2
укмыстонэтӥ/L1L2
укмыстонэтӥез/L1L2
укмысэтӥ/L1L2
витьнады/M1L2D1
витьназы/M1L2D1
витьнамы/M1L2D1
даснады/M1L2D1
дасназы/M1L2D1
даснамы/M1L2D1
кӧня/M1L2
куатьнады/M1L2D1
куатьназы/M1L2D1
куатьнамы/M1L2D1
куиньнады/M1L2D1
куиньназы/M1L2D1
куиньнамы/M1L2D1
кыкнады/M1L2D1
кыкназы/M1L2D1
кыкнамы/M1L2D1
нокудды/M1L2D1
ньыльнады/M1L2D1
ньыльназы/M1L2D1
ньыльнамы/M1L2D1
огдылы-огды/M1L2D1
огез-но/M1L2
огзы/M1L2
огзы-огзы/M1L2
огнад/M1L2D1
огнады/M1L2D1
огназы/M1L2D1
огнамы/M1L2D1
ог-огды/M1L2D1
ог-огзы/M1L2N2
одӥгез/M1L2D1
одӥгнад/M1L2D1
одӥгназ/M1L2D1
одӥгнам/M1L2
сыӵе/M1A1A2
тямыснады/M1L2D1
тямыснамы/M1L2D1
укмыснады/M1L2D1
укмысназы/M1L2D1
укмыснамы/M1L2D1
ал/N2A1A2
бадьпу/N2A1A2
берпал/N2A1A2
былан/N2A1A2
ву/N2A1A2
голёкан/N2A1A2
дару/N2A1A2
етӥн/N2A1A2
зырян/N2A1A2
какао/N2A1A2
кат/N2A1A2
кисы/N2A1A2
коньывуон/N2A1A2
кугӟо/N2A1A2
кыктос/N2L2
кылтэчы/N2A1A2
лудкеч/N2A1A2
мийым/N2A1A2D1
негр/N2A1A2
ож/N2A1A2
патефон/N2A1A2
поролон/N2A1A2
пыш/N2A1A2
серб/N2A1A2
сурым/N2A1A2D1
тотобыля/N2A1A2D1
ул/N2A1A2
хлор/N2A1A2
чуаш/N2A1A2
шунёк/N2A1A2
энгек/N2A1A2
ярдур/N2A1A2
акартэм/A1A2
пыдсысь/A1A2
ӝуко/A1A2
комокесь/A1A2
вакытлыко/A1A2 # С.М.
йӧнбуро/A1A2 # С.М.
палдурскемо/A1A2 # С.М.
чичпотӥсь/A1A2 # С.М.
пыӵето/A1A2 # С.М.
